Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 1. Department of Energy.

§ 45.2-100.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Chief”
means the Chief of the Division of Mines of the Department of Energy.

“Department”
means the Department of Energy.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Energy.

“State Geologist”
means the Commissioner of Mineral Resources and State Geologist appointed pursuant to §

45.2-107

.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-1.2; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.1; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 387, 532.

Transition provisions.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 recodified former

Titles 45.1

and 67 as Title 45.2. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. The case notes appearing under new sections were decided under corresponding former sections or under prior law. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.
In addition to revision by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387,

Titles 45.1

and 67,
were also amended by other acts passed at the 2021 Regular and Special Session I. As required by § 30-152, the Virginia Code Commission has incorporated the majority of these amendments into the new sections.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 2 provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions, or contents of any section or chapter of Title 45.1, Title 67, or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such title existed prior to October 1, 2021, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 45.2 or any other title of the Code of Virginia and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 45.2 or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 45.1, Title 67, or any other title appearing in the Code of Virginia shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, or portions thereof.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 3 provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of Title 45.1 or such other titles of the Code of Virginia as are in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the revision of Title 45.1 and repeal of Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2021 Session of the General Assembly, notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 5 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective October 1, 2021, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit, or action pending on that date. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, nor the enactment of Title 45.2 shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2021, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purposes of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2021, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 6 provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2021, shall be valid although given, taken, or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title 45.2 had been effective before the same was given, taken, or issued.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 7 provides: “That if any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section of Title 45.2 shall be adjudged in any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered, and to this end the provisions of Title 45.2 are declared severable.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 8 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective as of October 1, 2021, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any loan agreement or other contract, or any right established or accrued under such loan agreement or other contract, that existed prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 9 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective October 1, 2021, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any properly recorded deed that was recorded prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 10 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 6.1 (§§

11-34.1

through 11-34.4) of Title 11, Title 45.1 (§§ 45.1-161.1 through 45.1-399), §§

62.1-195.1

and

62.1-195.3

, and Title 67 (§§

67-100

through 67-1700) of the Code of Virginia, effective as of October 1, 2021, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any bond or other debt obligation authorized, issued, or outstanding prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 12 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the existing terms of persons currently serving as members of any agency, board, authority, commission, or other entity and that appointees currently holding positions shall maintain their terms of appointment and continue to serve until such time as the existing terms might expire or become renewed. However, any new appointments made on or after October 1, 2021, shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, amended § 45.1-161.1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2021, Sp. Sess. I amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy” throughout the section.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-101.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this title the Chief, the Director, or the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Chief, the Director, or the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566, § 45.1-161.1:1; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-102.
Department of Energy; appointment of Director.

The Department of Energy is established in the executive branch within the Secretariat of Commerce and Trade. The Department shall be headed by a Director who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, to serve at the pleasure of the Governor for a term coincident with the Governor’s term.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-1.1; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.2; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 387, 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, amended § 45.1-161.2 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the amendment by c. 532 has been given effect in this section by substituting “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-103.
Powers of Department.

The Department shall have the following powers and duties, any of which, with the approval of the Director, may be exercised by any division of the Department with respect to matters assigned to that division:

To employ the personnel required to carry out the purposes of this title;

To make and enter into any contract or agreement necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this title, including reciprocal agreements with responsible officers of other states and contracts with the private sector, the United States, other state agencies, and governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth;

To accept grants from the United States government and agencies and instrumentalities thereof and any other source. To these ends, the Department may comply with any condition and execute any agreement that is necessary, convenient, or desirable;

To adopt regulations necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties or execution of its powers under this title or any other provision of law. Such regulations shall be adopted by the Department, the Chief, or the Director, as appropriate, and in accordance with the provisions of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act; and

To do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this title.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-1.3; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.3; 2014, c. 145; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-104.
Powers and duties of Director.

The Director, under the direction and control of the Governor, shall exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred or imposed upon him by law and shall perform any other duties required of him by the Governor.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-1.4; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.4; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 973, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy shall, in cooperation with the Department of Environmental Quality, the Department of Taxation, and the Department of Motor Vehicles, convene a working group to determine the feasibility of an electric vehicle rebate program. Other relevant stakeholders, including (i) automobile manufacturers, (ii) motor vehicle dealers, (iii) electric vehicle charging network representatives, (iv) electric vehicle manufacturers, (v) environmental organizations, and (vi) energy utility organizations, shall be invited to participate in such working group. Such working group shall (a) review potential methods of structuring and administering an electric vehicle rebate program, (b) review funding opportunities available to facilitate such a rebate, (c) evaluate the vehicle sales data in states in which an electric vehicle rebate program has been implemented before and after such implementation, and (d) determine the ideal metrics for an electric vehicle rebate program. Any recommendations issued by such working group shall be guided by the following parameters: (1) no program shall authorize rebates of more than $4,500 for individual consumer purchases of qualified zero-emission vehicles; (2) the program may include incentives for individuals with an income below 300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; (3) the program shall allow both online and paper applications; and (4) the program, if properly funded, will be operational no later than December 30, 2021. The working group shall issue a report on the work completed by the working group and the recommendations of the working group to the General Assembly by November 1, 2020.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-104.1.
Appointment of Chief Clean Energy Policy Advisor.

The Chief Clean Energy Policy Advisor shall be appointed by the Governor and shall be under the direction of and report to the Director.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, enacted § 45.1-161.4:1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the enactment by c. 532 has been given effect as this section.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-105.
Establishment of divisions; division heads.

The following divisions, through which the functions, powers, and duties of the Department may be discharged, are established in the Department: a Division of Mines, a Division of Mined Land Repurposing, a Division of Geology and Mineral Resources, a Division of Gas and Oil, a Division of Mineral Mining, a Division of Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency, and a Division of Offshore Wind. The Director may establish other divisions as he deems necessary. The Director shall appoint persons to direct the various functions and programs of each division and may delegate to the head of any division any of the powers and duties conferred or imposed by law on the Director.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-1.5; 1990, c. 92; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.5; 2008, c. 369; 2020, c. 794; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 387, 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, amended § 45.1-161.5 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the amendment by c. 532 has been given effect in this section by substituting “Repurposing” for “Reclamation,” “Division of Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency” for “Division of Energy” and “The Director” for “Except as provided in § 45.1-161.15 with respect to the Chief of the Division of Mines, the Director.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Compulsory pooling orders. —

The Virginia Gas and Oil Board may issue compulsory pooling orders that permit deduction of post-production costs downstream of the wellhead when computing gas owners’ one-eighth royalty interests.
See opinion of Attorney General to Bradley C. Lambert, Chairman, Virginia Gas & Oil Board, Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy, 09-018, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (6/10/09).

§ 45.2-106.
Department to serve as lead agency for inspections undertaken subsequent to the issuance of a permit.

Following the issuance of any permit under Chapter 10 (§

45.2-1000

et seq.) or 12 (§

45.2-1200

et seq.), the Department shall serve as the lead agency for enforcement of the provisions of the permit. Any other agency that has reviewed and approved, or not disapproved, a permit application prior to its approval by the Director shall contact the Director or his designee prior to making any routine inspection. The Director or his designee shall then contact the permittee, if prior contact is to be made, to schedule the inspection and shall accompany any employee of any agency other than the Department during any inspection by such other agency. However, nothing in this section shall apply in the event of a blackwater discharge, a failure of a waste treatment facility, or any situation that in the judgment of the State Water Control Board requires an inspection on an emergency or expedited basis.

History.

1984, c. 188, § 45.1-1.9; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.6; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.